Utah statutes.
59-2-1337.   Pro rata application of ad valorem tax on property taken by
eminent domain or by right of entry agreement.
If any property is taken in fee by the state, any of its subdivisions or
agencies, or by any private person, or other body pursuant to either (1) an
exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (2) by a right of entry agreement
executed by reason of the threat or imminence of eminent domain, the ad
valorem property tax assessed and collected on the property under this chapter
shall be determined on the basis of the relationship which the number of
months the property was held by the property owner, prior to the granting by
the court of an order of occupancy or the execution of a right of entry
agreement, bears to the taxable year.
